Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 2 State Building, Plumbing, and Electrical Codes

Cross references.

Authority of counties to adopt or amend electrical, plumbing codes, §

36-13-1

et seq. Local Government Code Enforcement Boards, §

36-74-1

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Georgia State Minimum Standards Code, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-11-1.

Georgia State Energy Code for Buildings, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia State Building Administrative Board, Chapter 90-3-1.

Licensing of electrical contractors, master plumbers, journeyman plumbers, and conditioned air contractors, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Construction Industry Licensing Board, Chapters 121-2, 121-3, and 121-4.

8-2-20.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Affairs.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community affairs.

“Department” means the Department of Community Affairs.

“Exempted building” means any of the following:

Any building whose peak design rate of energy usage for heating, cooling, ventilation, and lighting is less than one watt or 3.4 British thermal units (BTUs) per hour per square foot of floor area for all purposes;

Any building which is neither mechanically heated nor mechanically cooled;

Any mobile home; and

Any building owned or leased in whole or in part by the United States.

“Exterior envelope” means those elements of a building which enclose conditioned spaces through which thermal energy may be transferred to or from the exterior.

“New building” means any building on which final design is commenced after the adoption of the International Energy Conservation Code under this part.

“Public building” means any building which is open to the public during normal business hours and is not an exempted building, including the following:

Any building which provides facilities or shelter for public assembly or which is used for educational, office, or institutional purposes;

Any inn, hotel, motel, sports arena, supermarket, transportation terminal, retail store, restaurant, or other commercial establishment which provides services or retails merchandise;

Any portion of an industrial plant building used primarily as office space; and

Any building owned by the state or a political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, including libraries, museums, schools, hospitals, auditoriums, sports arenas, and university buildings.

“Renovated building” means either of the following:

A building undergoing alteration of the exterior envelope; heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning systems; water-heating systems; or lighting systems, for which the aggregate cost of alteration exceeds 10 percent of the assessed value of the building immediately prior to such alteration; or

A building undergoing alteration in the physical configuration or interior space, for which the aggregate cost of alteration exceeds one-fourth of the assessed value of the building immediately prior to such alteration.

On and after October 1, 1991, “state minimum standard codes” means the following codes:

Standard Building Code (SBCCI);

National Electrical Code as published by the National Fire Protection Association;

Standard Gas Code (SBCCI);

Standard Mechanical Code (SBCCI);

Georgia State Plumbing Code or the Standard Plumbing Code (SBCCI);

Council of American Building Officials One- and Two-Family Dwelling Code, with the exception of Part V — Plumbing (Chapters 20-25) of said code;

Georgia State Energy Code for Buildings as adopted by the State Building Administrative Board pursuant to an Act approved April 10, 1978 (Ga. L. 1978, p. 2212), as such code exists on September 30, 1991;

Standard Fire Prevention Code (SBCCI);

Standard Housing Code (SBCCI);

Standard Amusement Device Code (SBCCI);

Excavation and Grading Code (SBCCI);

Standard Existing Buildings Code (SBCCI);

Standard Swimming Pool Code (SBCCI); and

Standard Unsafe Building Abatement Code (SBCCI).

The codes provided in division (i) of this subparagraph shall mean such codes as they exist on October 1, 1991, provided that the department, with the approval of the board, may adopt a subsequently published edition of any such code as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-23; and provided, further, that any such code may hereafter be amended or revised as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 8-2-23.

On or after July 1, 2004, “state minimum standard codes” means the following codes:

International Building Code (ICC);

National Electrical Code (NFPA);

International Fuel Gas Code (ICC);

International Mechanical Code (ICC);

International Plumbing Code (ICC);

International Residential Code for One- and Two-Family Dwellings (ICC);

International Energy Conservation Code (ICC);

International Fire Code (ICC);

International Existing Building Code (ICC);

International Property Maintenance Code (ICC); and

Any other codes deemed appropriate by the board for the safety and welfare of Georgia’s citizens.

The codes provided in division (i) of this subparagraph shall mean such codes as they exist on July 1, 2004, provided that the department, with the approval of the board, may adopt a subsequently published edition of any such code as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-23; and provided, further, that any such code may hereafter be amended or revised as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 8-2-23.

References to any standard code in this part shall mean one of the standard codes listed in division (i) of subparagraph (A) or division (i) of subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

The term “state minimum standard codes” shall specifically not include the Georgia State Fire Code as adopted by the Safety Fire Commissioner pursuant to Code Section 25-2-13 nor shall any state minimum standard code be less restrictive than the Georgia State Fire Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 2212, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1364, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2011).

8-2-21.
Adoption and continuation of state minimum standard codes; enforcement of codes.

Enforcement of the state minimum standard codes provided for in divisions (9)(A)(i) and (9)(B)(i) of Code Section 8-2-20 shall not include enforcement of appendices to such codes except when:

Any provision of an appendix is specifically referenced in the code text;

An appendix to a code is specifically included in an administrative ordinance adopted by a municipality or county; or

An appendix to a code is specifically adopted by the department with the approval of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 2; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 2.

8-2-22.
Licensing of trades, professions, and businesses governed by Chapter 14 of Title 43 and rules and regulations of State Construction Industry Licensing Board.

Provisions for licensing trades, professions, and businesses covered by the provisions of this article shall be as determined by Chapter 14 of Title 43 and the rules and regulations of the State Construction Industry Licensing Board created in such chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 3.

8-2-23.
Amendment and revision of codes generally; installation of high-efficiency cooling towers; review.

The department, with the approval of the board, may from time to time revise and amend the state minimum standard codes either on its own motion or upon recommendation from any citizen, profession, state agency, or political subdivision of the state. Upon approval by a majority of the board, each such amendment, modification, or new provision shall be held to be in full force and effect as if it were included in the original adopted code. Prior to the adoption of any proposed amendment, modification, or new provision, the department shall conduct such public hearings as are required by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” for the adoption of rules. Such public hearings shall be conducted at such places, on such dates, and at such times as may be determined by the department.

Revisions of or amendments to the International Energy Conservation Code shall not become effective without the approval of the Division of Energy Resources of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority. The department shall consult with the division during the revision or amendment of such code and shall submit such revisions or amendments to the division for approval at least ten days prior to the adoption thereof.

The department shall make copies of amendments to codes available to members of the general public at such price as it deems reasonable to defray the costs of publication and handling. Notice of amendments to or adoption of a new edition of any state minimum standard code which is applicable state wide shall be provided by the department to the chief elected official and the chief building enforcement official of a municipality or county and to the chief fire official of each fire department certified pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 25 at least ten days prior to the effective date of such amendments.

The revision or amendment of any of the state minimum standard codes shall have reasonable and substantial connection with the public health, safety, and general welfare.

The department, with the approval of the board, may adopt a new edition of any state minimum standard code either on its own motion or upon recommendation from any profession, state agency, or political subdivision of this state. Upon approval by a majority of the board, each new code edition shall be held to be in full force and effect as if it was the original adopted code. Prior to the adoption of any new edition of a state minimum standard code, the department shall conduct such public hearings as are required by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” for the adoption of rules. Such public hearings shall be conducted at such places, on such dates, and at such times as may be determined by the department.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” or any other provision of law, the department shall not be required to make available or to distribute any copies of a new edition of a state minimum standard code adopted by the department.

On or before July 1, 2012, the department, with the approval of the board, shall amend applicable state minimum standard codes to require the installation of high-efficiency cooling towers in new construction permitted on or after July 1, 2012.

As used in this subsection, the term “cooling tower” means a building heat removal device used to transfer process waste heat to the atmosphere.

The standards related to high-efficiency cooling towers shall include without limitation the minimum standards prescribed by the American Society of Heating, Refrigerating, and Air-Conditioning Engineers Standard 90.1 as adopted and amended by the department.

On or after July 1, 2020, the department shall undertake a review of the tall mass timber provisions of the 2021 International Building Code, approved by the International Code Council, for the purpose of considering whether the department, with the approval of the board, shall amend the Georgia state minimum standard codes to include provisions for tall mass timber as contained in the 2021 International Building Code for construction types IV-A, IV-B, and IV-C.

The department shall complete the review provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection before July 1, 2021.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 5; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2212, §§ 4, 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 4; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1108, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 9/SB 370; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244; Ga. L. 2020, p. 54, § 1/HB 777.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added subsection (d).

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Division of Energy Resources generally, §

50-23-32

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 1/SB 370, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need to create a culture of water conservation in the State of Georgia. The General Assembly also recognizes the imminent need to plan for water supply enhancement during future extreme drought conditions and other water emergencies. In order to achieve these goals, the General Assembly directs the Georgia Department of Natural Resources to coordinate with its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority [now known as the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority], the Georgia Department of Community Affairs, the Georgia Forestry Commission, the Georgia Department of Community Health, including its Division of Public Health, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission to work together as appropriate to develop programs for water conservation and water supply.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Georgia State Minimum Standards Code, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-11-1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conservation and Natural Resources,” see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 185 (2011).

8-2-24.
Appointment of advisory committee; reimbursement of members for expenses; use of subcommittees; submittal of proposed amendments, modifications, and new provisions to committee; meeting times of committee.

For the purpose of assisting the department in carrying out the provisions of Code Section 8-2-23, the commissioner shall appoint an advisory committee to be composed of 21 members as follows:

The Safety Fire Commissioner or his or her designee as an ex officio member with full voting privileges;

The commissioner of public health or his or her designee as an ex officio member with full voting privileges;

The commissioner of community affairs or his or her designee as an ex officio member with full voting privileges;

One representative of the home-building industry;

One representative of the industrialized building industry;

One representative of the general contracting industry;

One representative of the profession of mechanical engineering;

One licensed architect;

One licensed electrical engineer;

One representative of the manufactured homes industry;

One licensed electrical contractor;

One building material dealer;

One licensed plumbing contractor;

One licensed conditioned-air contractor;

One licensed structural engineer;

Four municipal or county code enforcement officials; and

Two local fire officials.

All appointments to the committee shall be for a term of four years; provided, however, that the initial members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (7), (9), (15), (16), and (17) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be appointed for a term to expire on the same date as the terms of other members. A member shall serve until his or her successor has been duly appointed. The commissioner shall make appointments to fill the unexpired portion of any term vacated for any reason. In making such appointments, the commissioner shall preserve the composition of the committee as required by this Code section. Any appointed member who, during his or her term, ceases to meet the qualifications for original appointment shall thereby forfeit his or her membership on the committee. Membership on the committee shall not constitute public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by virtue of his or her membership. Each member of the committee shall serve without compensation, but each member of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel and other reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by him or her while attending called meetings of the committee.

The advisory committee shall be empowered to use subcommittees as it deems necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities. Members of such subcommittees shall be knowledgeable of the subject matter with which the subcommittee is concerned and shall be appointed by the commissioner upon the recommendation of the advisory committee. Such subcommittee members shall be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses while attending subcommittee meetings in the same manner as that of advisory committee members.

Any amendments, modifications, or new provisions to the state minimum standard codes, when such are prepared, proposed, or recommended by the department, shall, prior to their submission to the board for approval, be submitted to the advisory committee for review and consideration. The department shall not forward any such amendment, modification, or new provision to the board without a favorable recommendation of a majority of the advisory committee.

The advisory committee shall have at least two regular meetings annually and shall meet at other times as determined by the commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 242, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 651, § 5; Ga. L. 1976, p. 654, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 698, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 8/HB 90; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Any appointed member” for “Any appointive member” at the beginning of the fifth sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 8, was superseded by the amendment by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 5, which was enacted later.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

8-2-24.1.
Review of denial of proposed amendment, modification, or new provision to code.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of Code Section 8-2-24, when any party has proposed an amendment, modification, or new provision to a state minimum standard code and the same has not received a favorable recommendation by the advisory committee, the aggrieved party may within 30 days after notification by the department of the advisory committee’s action file an appeal with the board. Not more than 60 days after receiving such appeal, the board shall make a determination whether to deny the appeal or to review the proposed amendment, modification, or new provision and make a determination on the same pursuant to Code Section 8-2-23.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 6.

8-2-25.
State-wide application of minimum standard codes; codes requiring local adoption and more stringent requirements by local governments; adoption of standards for which state code does not exist; exemption for certain farm buildings or structures.

On and after July 1, 2004, the state minimum standard codes enumerated in subdivisions (9)(A)(i)(I) through (9)(A)(i)(VIII) and (9)(B)(i)(I) through (9)(B)(i)(VIII) of Code Section 8-2-20 shall have state-wide application and shall not require adoption by a municipality or county. The governing authority of any municipality or county in this state is authorized to enforce the state minimum standard codes enumerated in this subsection.

The state minimum standard codes enumerated in subdivisions (9)(A)(i)(IX) through (9)(A)(i)(XIV) and (9)(B)(i)(IX) through (9)(B)(i)(XI) of Code Section 8-2-20 shall not be applicable in a jurisdiction until adopted by a municipality or county. The governing authority of any municipality or county in this state is authorized to adopt and enforce the state minimum standard codes enumerated in this subsection in that subject area which is being regulated by the municipality or county, and a copy of the local ordinance or resolution adopting any such code shall be forwarded to the department in order that such municipality or county may be apprised of subsequent amendments in the state minimum standard code so adopted.

In the event that the governing authority of any municipality or county finds that the state minimum standard codes do not meet its needs, the local government may provide requirements not less stringent than those specified in the state minimum standard codes when such requirements are based on local climatic, geologic, topographic, or public safety factors; provided, however, that there is a determination by the local governing body of a need to amend the requirements of the state minimum standard code based upon a demonstration by the local governing body that local conditions justify such requirements not less stringent than those specified in the state minimum standard codes for the protection of life and property. All such proposed amendments shall be submitted by the local governing body to the department 60 days prior to the adoption of such amendment. Concurrent with the submission of the proposed amendment to the department, the local governing body shall submit in writing the legislative findings of the governing body and such other documentation as the local governing body deems helpful in justifying the proposed amendment. The department shall review and comment on a proposed amendment. Such comment shall be in writing and shall be sent to the submitting local government with a recommendation:

That the proposed local amendment should not be adopted, due to the lack of sufficient evidence to show that such proposed local amendment would be as stringent as the state minimum standard codes and the lack of sufficient evidence to show that local climatic, geologic, topographic, or public safety factors require such an amendment;

That the proposed local amendment should be adopted, due to a preponderance of evidence that such proposed local amendment would be as stringent as the state minimum standard codes and a preponderance of evidence that the local climatic, geologic, topographic, or public safety factors require such an amendment; or

That the department has no recommendation regarding the adoption or disapproval of the proposed local amendments, due to the lack of sufficient evidence to show that such proposed local amendment would or would not be as stringent as the state minimum standard codes and the lack of sufficient evidence to show that local climatic, geologic, topographic, or public safety factors require or do not require such an amendment.

The department shall have 60 days after receipt of a proposed local amendment to review the proposed amendment and make a recommendation as set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection. In the event that the department fails to respond within the time allotted, the local governing body may adopt the proposed local amendment.

In the event that the department recommends against the adoption of the proposed local amendment, a local governing body shall specifically vote to reject the department’s recommendations before any local amendment may be adopted.

No local amendment shall become effective until the local governing body has caused a copy of the adopted amendment to be filed with the department. A copy of an amendment shall be deemed to have been filed with the department when it has been placed in the United States mail, return receipt requested.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to require approval by the department before a local amendment shall become effective.

The department shall maintain a file of all amendments to the state minimum standard codes adopted by the various municipalities and counties in the state, which information shall be made available to the public upon request. The department may charge reasonable fees for copies of such information. An index of such amendments shall be included in each new edition of a state minimum standard code.

At the time of issuing a building permit, the issuing county or municipality shall notify the holder of the permit of any local amendments to the state minimum standard codes which are in effect for that county or municipality and that any such amendments are on file with the department. A county or municipality may satisfy this notice requirement by posting or providing a summary of the topic of such local amendment or amendments and the address and telephone number of the department.

(c.1)

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this Code section, no county or municipality shall prohibit the use of wood as a construction material so long as such use conforms to all applicable state minimum standard codes and the Georgia State Fire Code.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, building related codes or ordinances dealing with the subjects of historic preservation, high-rise construction, or architectural design standards for which a state minimum standard code does not exist may be adopted by a local jurisdiction following review by the department. The department’s review shall be limited to a determination that the proposed code or ordinance is consistent with the approved state minimum standard codes when common elements exist and is not less restrictive than the requirement of said codes. Changes to all other state minimum standard codes shall be approved only pursuant to the provisions of this Code section regarding local amendments.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Agriculture,” “agricultural operations,” or “agricultural or farm products” has the meaning provided by Code Section 1-3-3.

“Farm” means real property or a portion thereof used for agricultural operations.

“Farm building or structure” means a building or structure that is located on a farm and designed by the USDA Natural Resources Conservation Service (NRCS), not used for residential purposes, not intended primarily for public use, and used primarily for or in connection with agricultural operations for the sole purposes of manure storage and animal mortality composting or winter feeding and following the standards and specifications of NRCS practice codes 313 — Waste Storage Facility and 317 — Composting Facility as detailed in the USDA NRCS Field Office Technical Guide as such existed on January 1, 2011.

Farm buildings or structures shall be exempt from the state minimum standard building codes provided for in subdivisions (9)(B)(i)(I) and (9)(B)(i)(IX) of Code Section 8-2-20 and any amendment thereto adopted by the department pursuant to Code Section 8-2-23 or by a municipality or county pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 546, § 5; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1316, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 8; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1659, § 7; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1364, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 452, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 551, § 5; Ga. L. 2011, p. 352, § 1/HB 223; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 8/HB 942; Ga. L. 2018, p. 919, § 1/HB 876.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added subsection (c.1).